Arkansas, session 2025, HB1438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Credit for homestead property tax paid.
(a) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount determined under subsection (b) of this
section for a taxpayer who is at sixty-five (65) years of age or older during
the tax year.
(b) The amount of the income tax credit allowed under subsection (a)
of this section is equal to the amount of real property tax paid by the
taxpayer during the tax year on the taxpayer's homestead minus any amount
paid by the taxpayer for delinquent property tax or penalties on delinquent
property tax during the past year.
(c) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess shall be refunded to
*JLL172*
02/10/2025 12:22:10 PM JLL172

HB1438
the taxpayer.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
































02/10/2025 12:22:10 PM JLL172